Hawaii statutes.
[§321‑474] Exception.
Information regarding an ongoing civil or criminal investigation shall be
disclosed at the discretion of the applicable state or county law enforcement
agency. [L 2006, c 82, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next